Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "911 communications center[,]" for purposes of this chapter[,] means a public safety answering point or any other entity that captures and maintains data that is utilized in a 911 emergency communications system, as defined in RCW 38.52.010.

(2) "Advisory board" means the office of independent investigations advisory board.

(3) "Deadly force" has the meaning provided in RCW 9A.16.010.

(4) "Director" means the director of the office of independent investigations.

(5) "Great bodily harm" has the meaning provided in RCW 9A.04.110.

(6) "In-custody" refers to a person who is under the physical control of a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020 or a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.

(7) "Independent investigation team" means a team of qualified and certified peace officer investigators, civilian crime scene specialists, and other representatives who operate independently of any involved agency to conduct investigations of police deadly force incidents. An independent investigation team may be comprised of multiple law enforcement agencies who jointly investigate police use of force incidents in their geographical regions or may be a single law enforcement agency, provided it is not the involved agency.

(8) "Involved agency" means a general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, that employs or supervises the officer or officers who are an involved officer as defined in this section, or an agency responsible for a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.

(9) "Involved officer" means one of the following persons who is involved in an incident as an actor or custodial officer in which the act or omission by the individual is within the scope of the jurisdiction of the office as defined in this chapter:

(a) A general authority Washington peace officer, specially commissioned Washington peace officer, or limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, whether on or off duty if he or she is exercising his or her authority as a peace officer; or

(b) An individual while employed in a city, county, or regional adult or juvenile institution, correctional, jail, holding, or detention facility as defined in RCW 70.48.020, 72.09.015, or 13.40.020.

(10) "Office" means the office of independent investigations.

(11) "Substantial bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

[ 2024 c 64 s 1; 2021 c 318 s 201.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.